Hawaii, session 2026, SB2520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 213, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024 (Act 213), was enacted to deter certain habitual violent crimes, including sexual assaults, abuse of family or household members, and assaults against law enforcement officers, by increasing the offense to a class C felony if the person had three or more prior convictions for a violent crime within a five-year period. The legislature further finds that Act 213 sought to protect the public from habitual violent criminal offenders but, as a caution against the increased numbers of incarcerations, also included a provision to repeal the offense of habitual violent crime on June 30, 2027, pending an assessment of its effectiveness.  Given the amount of time it takes for felony cases to travel through our criminal justice system, more time is needed to evaluate Act 213's effectiveness in reducing habitual violent crimes.  For a valid assessment, best practices in research methodology recommend that data be collected for at least five years both before and after the law was passed. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Amend Act 213 by: (A)  Requiring the criminal justice research institute to submit a one-time report to the legislature before the regular session of 2031; and (B)  Repealing its sunset date; and (2)  Require the attorney general, in consultation with the criminal justice research institute, to submit ongoing annual reports to the legislature. PART II SECTION 2.  Act 213, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by adding a new section to read as follows: "SECTION 3A.  The criminal justice research institute shall analyze data on the effectiveness of this Act in reducing violent crime and submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2031.  The department of attorney general, judiciary, and other criminal justice agencies as needed shall provide data to the criminal justice research institute to complete the report." SECTION 3.  Act 213, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by amending section 6 to read as follows: "SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval[, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2027]." PART III SECTION 4.  Chapter 28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§28- Habitual violent crime; reports.  (a) The department of the attorney general, in consultation with the criminal justice research institute, shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027, and every year thereafter, on the effectiveness of section 707-712.2 in addressing repeat violent crime in the State.  Each report shall include data for that calendar year that includes, but is not limited to: (1)  The number of persons arrested or cited for an offense listed under section 707-712.2(1) who are also habitual violent crime offenders; (2)  The number of habitual violent crime offenders from paragraph (1) who have been arrested or cited for an offense listed under section 707-712.2(1) more than once since the enactment of Act , Session Laws of Hawaii 2026; (3)  The number of cases charged under section 707-712.2; and (4)  The outcomes of the cases charged under section 707‑712.2, including the number of cases that led to a trial, plea agreement, conviction, deferred acceptance of guilty or nolo contendere plea, incarceration, or probation. (b) The data included in the reports required by this section shall contain only information in aggregate form and not include any personally identifiable information.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to require disclosure of information that is confidential under state or federal law or protected by court order. (c)  No later than December 1, 2026, and every year thereafter, the prosecuting attorney of each county shall provide the department of the attorney general with the data to enable the department to complete the report required under subsection (a)." PART IV SECTION 5.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.